Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.770

All regulations shall be uniform in each zone.

All regulations shall be uniform in each zone, but the regulations in one zone may differ from those in other zones.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.770. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 77.]